District of Columbia statutes.
10-902

Publication of intended exchange.

No such exchange shall be made unless the Council of the District of Columbia shall, 30 days prior thereto, publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the said District a notice of its intention to make such exchange and such notice shall include a description by lot or parcel number or otherwise of all lots or parcels to be exchanged and the appraised value thereof.

Aug. 1, 1951, 65 Stat. 150, ch. 283
1981 Ed., § 9-502.
1973 Ed., § 9-402.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402 (193) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.